Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1371
Nuisance; abatement; acts prohibited; penalty.

(1) Maintaining or operating a crematory in violation of the Cremation of Human Remains Act or any rules and regulations of the department adopted and promulgated under the act is a public nuisance and may be abated as a nuisance as provided by law.

(2) It is a Class III misdemeanor to (a) establish, operate, or maintain a crematory subject to the Cremation of Human Remains Act without being licensed as a crematory authority under the act, (b) hold oneself out to the public as a crematory authority without being licensed under the act, or (c) perform a cremation without a cremation authorization form signed by the authorizing agent and a completed permit for transit or cremation as provided by the department or a cremation permit.

(3) Signing a cremation authorization form with actual knowledge that the form contains false, incorrect, or misleading information is a Class III misdemeanor.

(4) A violation of any other provision of the Cremation of Human Remains Act is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 17.